Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.270

Continuing competency pilot projects.

The disciplinary [disciplining] authorities are authorized to develop and require licensees' participation in continuing competency pilot projects for the purpose of developing flexible, cost-efficient, effective, and geographically accessible competency assurance methods. The secretary shall establish criteria for development of pilot projects and shall select the disciplinary [disciplining] authorities that will participate from among the professions requesting participation. The department shall administer the projects in mutual cooperation with the disciplinary [disciplining] authority and shall allot and administer the budget for each pilot project. The department shall report to the legislature in January of each odd-numbered year concerning the progress and findings of the projects and shall make recommendations on the expansion of continued competency requirements to other licensed health professions.

Each disciplinary [disciplining] authority shall establish its pilot project in rule and may support the projects from a surcharge on each of the affected profession's license renewal in an amount established by the secretary.

[ 1991 c 332 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application to scope of practice—Captions not law—1991 c 332: See notes following RCW 18.130.010.